California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(5) Allow providers, upon the initial signing, renewal, or amendment of a provider contract, to decline to be included in any list of contracted providers that is sold, leased, transferred, or conveyed to payors that do not actively encourage the payors’ beneficiaries to use the list of contracted providers when obtaining medical care as described in paragraph (2). Each provider’s election under this paragraph shall be binding on the contracting agent with which the provider has the contract and on any other contracting agent that buys, leases, or otherwise obtains the list of contracted providers. A provider shall not be excluded from any list of contracted providers that is sold, leased, transferred, or conveyed to payors that actively encourage the payors’ beneficiaries to use the list of contracted providers when obtaining medical care, based upon the provider’s refusal to be included on any list of contracted providers that is sold, leased, transferred, or conveyed to payors that do not actively encourage the payors’ beneficiaries to use the list of contracted providers when obtaining medical care.

(6) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to impose requirements or regulations upon payors, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d).

(c) Beginning July 1, 2000, a payor, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide an explanation of benefits or explanation of review that identifies the name of the plan or network that has a written agreement signed by the provider whereby the payor is entitled, directly or indirectly, to pay a preferred rate for the services rendered.

(2) Demonstrate that it is entitled to pay a contracted rate within 30 business days of receipt of a written request from a provider who has received a claim payment from the payor. The failure of a payor to make the demonstration within 30 business days shall render the payor responsible for the amount that the payor would have been required to pay pursuant to the contract between the payor and the beneficiary, which amount shall be due and payable within 10 business days of receipt of written notice from the provider, and shall bar the payor from taking any future discounts from that provider without the provider’s express written consent until the payor can demonstrate to the provider that it is entitled to pay a contracted rate as provided in this paragraph. A payor shall be deemed to have demonstrated that it is entitled to pay a contracted rate if it complies with either of the following:

(A) Discloses the name of the network that has a written agreement with the provider whereby the provider agrees to accept discounted rates, and describes the specific practices the payor utilizes to comply with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(B) Identifies the provider’s written agreement with a contracting agent whereby the provider agrees to be included on lists of contracted providers sold, leased, transferred, or conveyed to payors that do not actively encourage beneficiaries to use the list of contracted providers pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Beneficiary” means:

(A) For workers’ compensation insurance, an employee seeking health care services for a work-related injury.

(B) For automobile insurance, those persons covered under the medical payments portion of the insurance contract.

(C) For group or individual health services covered through a health care service plan contract, including a specialized health care service plan contract, or a policy of disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, a subscriber, an enrollee, a policyholder, or an insured.

(2) “Contracting agent” means a third-party administrator or trust not licensed under the Health and Safety Code, the Insurance Code, or the Labor Code, a self-insured employer, a preferred provider organization, or an independent practice association, while engaged, for monetary or other consideration, in the act of selling, leasing, transferring, assigning, or conveying, a provider or provider panel to provide health care services to beneficiaries. For purposes of this section, a contracting agent shall not include a health care service plan, including a specialized health care service plan, an insurer licensed under the Insurance Code to provide disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, automobile insurance, or workers’ compensation insurance, or a self-insured employer.

(3) (A) For purposes of subdivision (b), “payor” means a health care service plan, including a specialized health care service plan, an insurer licensed under the Insurance Code to provide disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, automobile insurance, workers’ compensation insurance, or a self-insured employer that is responsible to pay for health care services provided to beneficiaries.

(B) For purposes of subdivision (c), “payor” means only those entities that provide coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical benefits that are not regulated under the Health and Safety Code, the Insurance Code, or the Labor Code.

(4) “Payor summary” means a written summary that includes the payor’s name and the type of plan, including, but not limited to, a group health plan, an automobile insurance plan, and a workers’ compensation insurance plan.

(5) “Provider” means any of the following:

(A) Any person licensed or certified pursuant to this division.

(B) Any person licensed pursuant to the Chiropractic Initiative Act or the Osteopathic Initiative Act.

(C) Any person licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1440) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(D) A clinic, health dispensary, or health facility licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code.

(E) Any entity exempt from licensure pursuant to Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1069, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

511.3.

(a) When a contracting agent sells, leases, or transfers a health provider’s contract to a payor, the rights and obligations of the provider shall be governed by the underlying contract between the health care provider and the contracting agent.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Contracting agent” has the meaning set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 511.1.

(2) “Payor” has the meaning set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 511.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

511.4.

(a) A contracting agent, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 511.1, shall beginning July 1, 2006, prior to contracting, annually thereafter on or before the contract anniversary date, and, in addition, upon the contracted provider’s written request, disclose to contracting providers all of the following information in an electronic format:

(1) The amount of payment for each service to be provided under the contract, including any fee schedules or other factors or units used in determining the fees for each service. To the extent that reimbursement is made pursuant to a specified fee schedule, the contract shall incorporate that fee schedule by reference, including the year of the schedule. For any proprietary fee schedule, the contract shall include sufficient detail that payment amounts related to that fee schedule can be accurately predicted.

(2) The detailed payment policies and rules and nonstandard coding methodologies used to adjudicate claims, which shall, unless otherwise prohibited by state law, do all of the following:

(A) When available, be consistent with Current Procedural Terminology (CPT), and standards accepted by nationally recognized medical societies and organizations, federal regulatory bodies, and major credentialing organizations.

(B) Clearly and accurately state what is covered by any global payment provisions for both professional and institutional services, any global payment provisions for all services necessary as part of a course of treatment in an institutional setting, and any other global arrangements, such as per diem hospital payments.

(C) At a minimum, clearly and accurately state the policies regarding all of the following:

(i) Consolidation of multiple services or charges and payment adjustments due to coding changes.

(ii) Reimbursement for multiple procedures.

(iii) Reimbursement for assistant surgeons.

(iv) Reimbursement for the administration of immunizations and injectable medications.

(v) Recognition of CPT modifiers.

(b) The information disclosures required by this section shall be in sufficient detail and in an understandable format that does not disclose proprietary trade secret information or violate copyright law or patented processes, so that a reasonable person with sufficient training, experience, and competence in claims processing can determine the payment to be made according to the terms of the contract.

(c) A contracting agent may disclose the fee schedules mandated by this section through the use of a Web site, so long as it provides written notice to the contracted provider at least 45 days prior to implementing a Web site transmission format or posting any changes to the information on the Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 441, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

512.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), no contract that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 1999, between any person or entity, including, but not limited to, any group of physicians and surgeons, any medical group, any independent practice association (IPA), or any preferred provider organization (PPO), and a health care provider shall contain provisions that prohibit, restrict, or limit the health care provider from advertising.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the establishment of reasonable guidelines in connection with the activities regulated pursuant to this division, including those to prevent advertising that is, in whole or in part, untrue, misleading, deceptive, or otherwise inconsistent with this division or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. For advertisements mentioning a provider’s participation in a plan or product line of any person or entity, nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit requiring each advertisement to contain a disclaimer to the effect that the provider’s services may be covered for some, but not all, plans or product lines of that person or entity, or that the person or entity may cover some, but not all, provider services.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit provisions or agreements intended to protect service marks, trademarks, trade secrets, or other confidential information or property. If a health care provider participates on a provider panel or network as a result of a direct contractual arrangement with a person or entity, including, but not limited to, any group of physicians and surgeons, any medical group, any independent practice association, or any preferred provider organization, that, in turn, has entered into a direct contractual arrangement with another person or entity, pursuant to which enrollees, subscribers, insureds, and other beneficiaries of that other person or entity may receive covered services from the health care provider, then nothing in this section is intended to prohibit reasonable provisions or agreements in the direct contractual arrangement between the health care provider and the person or entity that protect the name or trade name of the other person or entity or require that the health care provider obtain the consent of the person or entity prior to the use of the name or trade name of the person or entity in any advertising by the health care provider.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or impede the authority of any state department to regulate advertising, disclosure, or solicitation pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 523, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Eyeglasses [525. - 527.]

525.

No dispensing optician, optometrist, or physician and surgeon shall dispense, prescribe, or sell any eyeglasses for use of a person whose sight is limited to one eye, a person who is a member of the California Highway Patrol or of a county sheriff’s office, a city police officer, a person who is a firefighter employed by the fire department of a city, county, city and county, or fire protection district and who normally wears such glasses for on-duty employment, or a person who is under 18 years of age, unless such eyeglasses are made with case-hardened lenses, with lenses made of laminated glass, with lenses made of resin material, or with lenses made of any other material resistant to shattering and which shall not be
 installed in frames manufactured of flammable material.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 7.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

526.

A dispensing optician, optometrist, or physician and surgeon shall not be subject to disciplinary action under this article unless they are informed by the person obtaining the eyeglasses or they have personal knowledge that the eyeglasses are for a person whose sight is limited to one eye, a person who is a member of the California Highway Patrol or of a county sheriff’s office, a city police officer, or a firefighter employed by the fire department of a city, county, city and county, or fire protection district, or a person who is under 18 years of age.

A dispensing optician, optometrist, or physician and surgeon is not required under this article to make any independent investigation
 of the occupation of the person for whom eyeglasses are intended or as to whether or not the sight of such person is limited to one eye.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 8.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

527.

Any dispensing optician, optometrist, or physician and surgeon who violates this article is subject to disciplinary action by the board that issues their license, registration, or certificate to engage in practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 9.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Ophthalmia Neonatorum [550. - 558.]

550.

As used in this article, “ophthalmia neonatorum,” independent of the nature of the infection, means any condition of the eye, or eyes, of any infant in which there is any inflammation, swelling or redness in either one or both of the eyes of any infant, either apart from or together with any unnatural discharge from the eye, or eyes, of any infant, at any time within two weeks after its birth.

As used in this article, “department” refers to the State Department of Health Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

551.

It is the duty of any physician, surgeon, obstetrician, midwife, nurse, maternity home or hospital of any nature, parent, relative, and any person or persons attendant upon, or assisting in any way whatsoever, either the mother or child, or both, at childbirth, to treat both eyes of the infant within two hours after birth with a prophylactic efficient treatment, and in all cases where the child develops within two weeks after its birth ophthalmia neonatorum, and such person knows it to exist, to report the case within 24 hours after knowledge, in such form as the department directs, to the local health officer of the county or city within which the mother of any such infant resides.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

552.

Any case of ophthalmia neonatorum or of blindness resulting from it upon which one accused of a violation of this article has been in attendance constitutes prima facie evidence of knowledge of the case by the one accused.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

553.

All maternity homes, hospitals, and similar institutions wherein childbirths occur shall keep a record of all cases of ophthalmia neonatorum occurring or discovered therein. These records shall be in the form and contain the matters which the department prescribes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

554.

The local health officer shall:

(a) Investigate each case filed with him in pursuance of this article, and all other cases coming to his attention.

(b) Report all cases of ophthalmia neonatorum coming to his knowledge, and the result of all investigations that he makes to the department, in such form as the department directs.

(c) Conform to such rules and regulations as the department promulgates for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

555.

The State Department of Health Services shall:

(a) Enforce the provisions of this article.

(b) Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out properly the provisions of this article.

(c) Print and publish any further advice and information concerning the dangers of ophthalmia neonatorum and the necessity for prompt and effective treatment thereof, as it deems necessary.

(d) Furnish without cost copies of this article to all physicians, midwives and such other persons as may be lawfully engaged in the practice of obstetrics or assisting at childbirths.

(e) Keep a proper record of any and all cases of ophthalmia neonatorum filed in its office in pursuance of this article, and as may come to its attention in any way, and such records shall constitute a part of the biennial report to the Governor and the Legislature.

(f) Report any and all violations of this article as may come to its attention to the district attorney of the county wherein any violation of any provision of this article has been committed, for the purpose of prosecution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

556.

The failure of any person mentioned in Section 551 to report, or the failure of any maternity home, hospital, or similar institution, to use the treatment prescribed in Section 551 and to record any and all cases of ophthalmia neonatorum, as directed in Section 553, or the failure or refusal of any person or institution, mentioned in this article, to obey any rule or regulation adopted by the department under this article constitutes a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined, for the first offense not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100); for a second offense not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200); and for a third offense, and thereafter not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400) for each violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

557.

If the person is a physician, midwife, or is a person who is professionally employed, the third conviction is sufficient cause for the revocation of his license by the board which has jurisdiction over it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

558.

One-half of all fines collected hereunder shall go to the county wherein the prosecution was had, and the remaining one-half thereof shall go into the state treasury and constitute a special fund to be expended by the department for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Frauds of Medical Records [580. - 585.]

580.

No person, company, or association shall sell or barter or offer to sell or barter any medical degree, podiatric degree, or osteopathic degree, or chiropractic degree, or any other degree which is required for licensure, certification, or registration under this division, or any degree, certificate, transcript, or any other writing, made or purporting to be made pursuant to any laws regulating the licensing and registration or issuing of a certificate to physicians and surgeons, podiatrists, osteopathic physicians, chiropractors, persons lawfully engaged in any other system or mode of treating the sick or afflicted, or to any other person licensed, certified, or registered under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 220, Sec. 2.   Effective June 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

581.

No person, company, or association shall purchase or procure by barter or by any unlawful means or method, or have in possession any diploma, certificate, transcript, or any other writing with intent that it shall be used as evidence of the holder’s qualifications to practice as a physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician, podiatrist, any other system or mode of treating the sick or afflicted, as provided in the Medical Practice Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000), or to practice as any other licentiate under this division or in any fraud of the law regulating this practice or, shall with fraudulent intent, alter in a material regard, any such diploma, certificate, transcript, or any other writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 220, Sec. 3.   Effective June 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

582.

No person, company, or association shall use or attempt to use any diploma, certificate, transcript, or any other writing which has been purchased, fraudulently issued, illegally obtained, counterfeited, or materially altered, either as a certificate or as to character or color of certificate, to practice as a physician and surgeon, podiatrist, osteopathic physician, or a chiropractor, or to practice any other system or mode of treating the sick or afflicted, as provided in the Medical Practice Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) or to practice as any other licentiate under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 220, Sec. 4.   Effective June 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

583.

No person shall in any document or writing required of an applicant for examination, license, certificate, or registration under this division, the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the Chiropractic Initiative Act, willfully make a false statement in a material regard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 220, Sec. 5.   Effective June 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

584.

No person shall violate the security of any examination, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 123, or impersonate, attempt to impersonate, or solicit the impersonation of, another in any examination for a license, certificate, or registration to practice as provided in this division, the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the Chiropractic Initiative Act, or under any other law providing for the regulation of any other system or method of treating the sick or afflicted in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1022, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

585.

Any person, company, or association violating the provisions of this article is guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punishable by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) nor more than six thousand dollars ($6,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code. The enforcement remedies provided under this article are not exclusive and shall not preclude the use of any other criminal, civil, or administrative remedy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 2.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Unearned Rebates, Refunds and Discounts [650. - 657.]

650.

(a) Except as provided in Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 1400) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, the offer, delivery, receipt, or acceptance by any person licensed under this division or the Chiropractic Initiative Act of any rebate, refund, commission, preference, patronage dividend, discount, or other consideration, whether in the form of money or otherwise, as compensation or inducement for referring patients, clients, or customers to any person, irrespective of any membership, proprietary interest, or coownership in or with any person to whom these patients, clients, or customers are referred is unlawful.

(b) The payment or receipt of consideration for services other than the referral of patients that is based on a percentage of gross revenue or
 similar type of contractual arrangement shall not be unlawful if the consideration is commensurate with the value of the services furnished or with the fair rental value of any premises or equipment leased or provided by the recipient to the payer.

(c) The offer, delivery, receipt, or acceptance of any consideration between a federally qualified health center, as defined in Section 1396d(l)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, and any individual or entity providing goods, items, services, donations, loans, or a combination thereof to the health center entity pursuant to a contract, lease, grant, loan, or other agreement, if that agreement contributes to the ability of the health center entity to maintain or increase the availability, or enhance the quality, of services provided to a medically underserved population served by the health center, shall be authorized only to the extent sanctioned or permitted by federal law.

(d) Except as provided in Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 1400) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and in Sections 654.1 and 654.2 of this code, it shall not be unlawful for any person licensed under this division to refer a person to any laboratory, pharmacy, clinic, including entities exempt from licensure pursuant to Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, or health care facility solely because the licensee has a proprietary interest or coownership in the laboratory, pharmacy, clinic, or health care facility, provided, however, that the licensee’s return on investment for that proprietary interest or coownership shall be based upon the amount of the capital investment or proportional ownership of the licensee which ownership interest is not based on the number or value of any patients referred. Any referral excepted under this section shall be unlawful if the prosecutor proves that there was no valid medical need for the
 referral.

(e) Except as provided in Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 1400) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and in Sections 654.1 and 654.2 of this code, it shall not be unlawful to provide nonmonetary remuneration, in the form of hardware, software, or information technology and training services, as described in subsections (x) and (y) of Section 1001.952 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended October 4, 2007, as published in the Federal Register (72 Fed. Reg. 56632 and 56644), and as subsequently amended.

(f) “Health care facility” means a general acute care hospital, acute psychiatric hospital, skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, and any other health facility licensed by the State Department of Public Health under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) Notwithstanding this section or any other law, the payment or receipt of consideration for advertising, wherein a licensee offers or sells services through a third-party advertiser, shall not constitute a referral of patients when the third-party advertiser does not itself recommend, endorse, or otherwise select a licensee. The fee paid to the third-party advertiser shall be commensurate with the service provided by the third-party advertiser. If the licensee determines, after consultation with the purchaser of the service, that the service provided by the licensee is inappropriate for the purchaser or if the purchaser elects not to receive the service for any reason and requests a refund, the purchaser shall receive a refund of the full purchase price as determined by the terms of the advertising service agreement between the third-party advertiser and the licensee. The licensee shall disclose in the advertisement that a consultation is
 required and that the purchaser will receive a refund if ineligible to receive the service. This subdivision shall not apply to basic health care services, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code, or essential health benefits, as defined in Section 1367.005 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10112.27 of the Insurance Code. The entity that provides the advertising shall be able to demonstrate that the licensee consented in writing to the requirements of this subdivision. A third-party advertiser shall make available to prospective purchasers advertisements for services of all licensees then advertising through the third-party advertiser in the applicable geographic region. In any advertisement offering a discount price for a service, the licensee shall also disclose the regular, nondiscounted price for that service.

(h) To the extent consistent with federal law, regulations, or guidance, the payment or
 receipt of consideration for internet-based advertising, appointment booking, or any service that provides information and resources to prospective patients of licensees shall not constitute a referral of a patient if the internet-based service provider does not recommend or endorse a specific licensee to a prospective patient.

(i) A violation of this section is a public offense and is punishable upon a first conviction by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by a fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. A second or subsequent conviction is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by that imprisonment and a fine of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 439, Sec. 3.   (AB 457)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

650.01.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 650, or any other provision of law, it is unlawful for a licensee to refer a person for laboratory, diagnostic nuclear medicine, radiation oncology, physical therapy, physical rehabilitation, psychometric testing, home infusion therapy, or diagnostic imaging goods or services if the licensee or their immediate family has a financial interest with the person or in the entity that receives the referral.

(b) For purposes of this section and Section 650.02, the following shall apply:

(1) “Diagnostic imaging” includes, but is not limited to, all X-ray,
 computed axial tomography, magnetic resonance imaging nuclear medicine, positron emission tomography, mammography, and ultrasound goods and services.

(2) A “financial interest” includes, but is not limited to, any type of ownership interest, debt, loan, lease, compensation, remuneration, discount, rebate, refund, dividend, distribution, subsidy, or other form of direct or indirect payment, whether in money or otherwise, between a licensee and a person or entity to whom the licensee refers a person for a good or service specified in subdivision (a). A financial interest also exists if there is an indirect financial relationship between a licensee and the referral recipient including, but not limited to, an arrangement whereby a licensee has an ownership interest in an entity that leases property to the referral recipient. Any financial interest
 transferred by a licensee to any person or entity or otherwise established in any person or entity for the purpose of avoiding the prohibition of this section shall be deemed a financial interest of the licensee. For purposes of this paragraph, “direct or indirect payment” shall not include a royalty or consulting fee received by a physician and surgeon who has completed a recognized residency training program in orthopedics from a manufacturer or distributor as a result of their research and development of medical devices and techniques for that manufacturer or distributor. For purposes of this paragraph, “consulting fees” means those fees paid by the manufacturer or distributor to a physician and surgeon who has completed a recognized residency training program in
 orthopedics only for their ongoing services in making refinements to their medical devices or techniques marketed or distributed by the manufacturer or distributor, if the manufacturer or distributor does not own or control the facility to which the physician is referring the patient. A “financial interest” shall not include the receipt of capitation payments or other fixed amounts that are prepaid in exchange for a promise of a licensee to provide specified health care services to specified beneficiaries. A “financial interest” shall not include the receipt of remuneration by a medical director of a hospice, as defined in Section 1746 of the Health and Safety Code, for specified services if the arrangement is set out in writing, and specifies all services to be provided by the medical director, the term of the arrangement is for at least one year, and the compensation to be paid over
 the term of the arrangement is set in advance, does not exceed fair market value, and is not determined in a manner that takes into account the volume or value of any referrals or other business generated between parties.

(3) For the purposes of this section, “immediate family” includes the spouse and children of the licensee, the parents of the licensee, and the spouses of the children of the licensee.

(4) “Licensee” means all of the following:

 (A) A physician as defined in Section 3209.3 of the Labor Code.

(B) A nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2837.103 or 2837.104. 

(C) A certified nurse-midwife as described in Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2746) of Chapter 6, acting within their scope of practice.

(5) “Licensee’s office” means either of the following:

(A) An office of a licensee in solo practice.

(B) An office in which services or goods are personally provided by the licensee or by employees in that office, or personally by independent contractors in that office, in accordance with
 other provisions of law. Employees and independent contractors shall be licensed or certified when licensure or certification is required by law.

(6) “Office of a group practice” means an office or offices in which two or more licensees are legally organized as a partnership, professional corporation, or not-for-profit corporation, licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, for which all of the following apply:

(A) Each licensee who is a member of the group provides substantially the full range of services that the licensee routinely provides, including medical care, consultation, diagnosis, or treatment through the joint use of shared office space, facilities, equipment, and personnel.

(B) Substantially all of the services of the licensees who are members of the group are provided through the group and are billed in the name of the group and amounts so received are treated as receipts of the group, except in the case of a multispecialty clinic, as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, physician services are billed in the name of the multispecialty clinic and amounts so received are treated as receipts of the multispecialty clinic.

(C) The overhead expenses of, and the income from, the practice are distributed in accordance with methods previously determined by members of the group.

(c) It is unlawful for a licensee to enter into an arrangement or scheme, such as a cross-referral arrangement, that the licensee knows,
 or should know, has a principal purpose of ensuring referrals by the licensee to a particular entity that, if the licensee directly made referrals to that entity, would be in violation of this section.

(d) No claim for payment shall be presented by an entity to any individual, third party payer, or other entity for a good or service furnished pursuant to a referral prohibited under this section.

(e) No insurer, self-insurer, or other payer shall pay a charge or lien for any good or service resulting from a referral in violation of this section.

(f) A licensee who refers a person to, or seeks consultation from, an organization in which the licensee has a financial interest, other than as prohibited by subdivision (a), shall
 disclose the financial interest to the patient, or the parent or legal guardian of the patient, in writing, at the time of the referral or request for consultation.

(1) If a referral, billing, or other solicitation is between one or more licensees who contract with a multispecialty clinic pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code or who conduct their practice as members of the same professional corporation or partnership, and the services are rendered on the same physical premises, or under the same professional corporation or partnership name, the requirements of this subdivision may be met by posting a conspicuous disclosure statement at the registration area or by providing a patient with a written disclosure statement.

(2) If a licensee
 is under contract with the Department of Corrections or the California Youth Authority, and the patient is an inmate or parolee of either respective department, the requirements of this subdivision shall be satisfied by disclosing financial interests to either the Department of Corrections or the California Youth Authority.

(g) A violation of subdivision (a) shall be a misdemeanor. In the case of a licensee who is a physician and surgeon, the Medical Board of California shall review the facts and circumstances of any conviction pursuant to subdivision (a) and take appropriate disciplinary action if the licensee has committed unprofessional conduct. In the case of a licensee who is a certified nurse-midwife, the Board of Registered Nursing shall review the facts and circumstances of any conviction pursuant to subdivision (a) and take
 appropriate disciplinary action if the licensee has committed unprofessional conduct. Violations of this section may also be subject to civil penalties of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each offense, which may be enforced by the Insurance Commissioner, Attorney General, or a district attorney. A violation of subdivision (c), (d), or (e) is a public offense and is punishable upon conviction by a fine not exceeding fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each violation and appropriate disciplinary action, including revocation of professional licensure, by the Medical Board of California, the Board of Registered Nursing, or other appropriate governmental agency.
